Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.270

Fraudulent filing of vehicle report of sale.

Every person who files a vehicle report of sale without the knowledge of the transferee shall be guilty of fraudulent filing of vehicle report of sale and shall be punished as follows:

(1) Where the victim incurred damages in an amount less than two hundred fifty dollars, the defendant is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) Where the victim incurred damages in an amount exceeding two hundred fifty dollars, the defendant is guilty of a class C felony.

(3) Where the victim incurred damages in an amount exceeding one thousand five hundred dollars, the defendant is guilty of a class B felony.

[ 2006 c 291 s 1.]